West Virginia, session 2026, HB5654.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-12o. Retirement benefits of member Division of Natural Resources Police Officers exempt. Retirement benefits received by Natural Resources Police Officers under §20-18-1 et seq. shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this article.